apertium-hbs-eng.eng.dix
    <pardef n="Barcelona__np">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="United_States__np">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="Mark__np">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="Mary__np">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="Smith__np">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>s</l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="Wikipedia__np">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>s</l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="Linux__np">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Termiti__np">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="one__num">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="two__num">
      <e r="RL">      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL">      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l><b/>hundred</l>        <r><b/>hundred<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l><b/>thousand</l>        <r><b/>thousand<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="million__num">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="twenty__num">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r></r>      </p>        <par n="two__num"/>     </e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>-one</l>        <r>-one</r>      </p>        <par n="two__num"/>     </e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>-two</l>        <r>-two</r>      </p>        <par n="two__num"/>     </e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>-three</l>        <r>-three</r>      </p>        <par n="two__num"/>     </e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>-four</l>        <r>-four</r>      </p>        <par n="two__num"/>     </e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>-five</l>        <r>-five</r>      </p>        <par n="two__num"/>     </e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>-six</l>        <r>-six</r>      </p>        <par n="two__num"/>     </e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>-seven</l>        <r>-seven</r>      </p>        <par n="two__num"/>     </e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>-eight</l>        <r>-eight</r>      </p>        <par n="two__num"/>     </e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>-nine</l>        <r>-nine</r>      </p>        <par n="two__num"/>     </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="ha/ve__vbmod">
      <e>      <p>        <l>ve</l>        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ve</l>        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>s</l>        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>d</l>        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>d</l>        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ving</l>        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ving</l>        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ving</l>        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="want__vbmod">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>s</l>        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ing</l>        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ing</l>        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ing</l>        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="will/__vbmod">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="c/an__vbmod">
      <e>      <p>        <l>an</l>        <r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL">      <p>        <l>an</l>        <r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ould</l>        <r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="/be_able_to__vbmod">
      <e>      <p>        <l>be<b/>able<b/>to</l>        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>are<b/>able<b/>to</l>        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>am<b/>able<b/>to</l>        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>is<b/>able<b/>to</l>        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>was<b/>able<b/>to</l>        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>was<b/>able<b/>to</l>        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>were<b/>able<b/>to</l>        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>been<b/>able<b/>to</l>        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>being<b/>able<b/>to</l>        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>being<b/>able<b/>to</l>        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>being<b/>able<b/>to</l>        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="ha/ve__vbhaver">
      <e>      <p>        <l>ve</l>        <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ve</l>        <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ve</l>        <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>s</l>        <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>d</l>        <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL">      <p>        <l>d</l>        <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ving</l>        <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ving</l>        <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ving</l>        <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    

    <e lm="around fifty"><i>around<b/>fifty</i><par n="one__num"/></e>
    <e lm="one"><i>one</i><par n="one__num"/></e>
    <e lm="Termiti"><i>Termiti</i><par n="Termiti__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Fluvia"><i>Fluvia</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Naira"><i>Naira</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Vanda"><i>Vanda</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Enio"><i>Enio</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Teranciano"><i>Teranciano</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Kolarević"><i>Kolarević</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Rogelio"><i>Rogelio</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Elle"><i>Elle</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Piper"><i>Piper</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Split"><i>Split</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Hraungerði"><i>Hraungerði</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Jupiter"><i>Jupiter</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Eurasia"><i>Eurasia</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
    <e lm="have"><i>ha</i><par n="ha/ve__vbhaver"/></e>
    <e lm="can"><i>c</i><par n="c/an__vbmod"/></e>
    <e r="RL"><i></i><par n="/be_able_to__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="have to"><i>ha</i><par n="ha/ve__vbmod"/><p><l><b/>to</l><r><g><b/>to</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="want to"><i>want</i><par n="want__vbmod"/><p><l><b/>to</l><r><g><b/>to</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="shall"><i>shall</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="would"><i>would</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="must"><i>must</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="should"><i>should</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="might"><i>might</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="one"><i>one</i><par n="one__num"/></e>
    <e lm="a thousand"><i>a<b/>thousand</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
    <e lm="a million"><i>a<b/>million</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
    <e lm="one hundred"><i>one<b/>hundred</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
    <e lm="one thousand"><i>one<b/>thousand</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
    <e lm="million"><i>million</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
    <e lm="five"><i>five</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
    <e lm="nine"><i>nine</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
    <e lm="hundred" r="RL"><i>hundred</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
    <e lm="trillion" r="RL"><i>trillion</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
    <e lm="eighteen"><i>eighteen</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
    <e lm="thirty"><i>thirty</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
    <e lm="forty"><i>forty</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
    <e lm="fifty"><i>fifty</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sixty"><i>sixty</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
    <e lm="eighty"><i>eighty</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
	<e lm="Tro"><i>Tro</i><par n="Linux__np"/></e>
	<e lm="Dr Raed Arafat"><i>Dr Raed Arafat</i><par n="United_States__np"/></e>
	<e lm="Barts"><i>Barts</i><par n="Linux__np"/></e>
	<e lm="Berani"><i>Berani</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
	<e lm="Dalmatina"><i>Dalmatina</i><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
	<e lm="Maglic"><i>Maglic</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
	<e lm="Neapolis"><i>Neapolis</i><par n="Linux__np"/></e>
	<e lm="Odartsi"><i>Odartsi</i><par n="United_States__np"/></e>
	<e lm="Rilindja"><i>Rilindja</i><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
	<e lm="Skurev"><i>Skurev</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
	<e lm="Dardenne"><i>Dardenne</i><par n="Linux__np"/></e>
	<e lm="Magda"><i>Magda</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
	<e lm="Perissa"><i>Perissa</i><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
	<e lm="Sharjah"><i>Sharjah</i><par n="United_States__np"/></e>
	<e lm="Lang"><i>Lang</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
	<e lm="Piatra"><i>Piatra</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
	<e lm="Elvira"><i>Elvira</i><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
	<e lm="Rosalyn"><i>Rosalyn</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
	<e lm="Leste"><i>Leste</i><par n="Linux__np"/></e>
	<e lm="Lesce"><i>Lesce</i><par n="United_States__np"/></e>
	<e lm="Sabanci"><i>Sabanci</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
	<e lm="Aconcagua"><i>Aconcagua</i><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
	<e lm="Sarajevo"><i>Sarajevo</i><par n="United_States__np"/></e>
	<e lm="Cordoba"><i>Cordoba</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
	<e lm="Maksimir"><i>Maksimir</i><par n="Linux__np"/></e>
	<e lm="Fischler"><i>Fischler</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
	<e lm="Uke"><i>Uke</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
	<e lm="Remi"><i>Remi</i><par n="United_States__np"/></e>
	<e lm="Tomica"><i>Tomica</i><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
